Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-433
Appeal; time; effect.

Any appeal to the Court of Appeals on any matter under sections 31-401 to 31-450 shall be taken within thirty days after the entry of the judgment, decree, or final order or within thirty days after the entry of the order overruling a motion for a new trial in such cause. Any such appeal shall not operate to stay proceedings.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 27, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 1897;

C.S.1922, § 1845;

C.S.1929, § 31-533;

R.S.1943, § 31-433;

Laws 1961, c. 138, § 4, p. 398;

Laws 1987, LB 33, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 90;

Laws 1999, LB 43, § 19.